Utah statutes.
63B-8-303.   Purchase and redemption requirements.

(1)  The notes and renewals of notes may provide the holders of the notes or renewals of notes with the right to require the state or other persons to purchase or redeem the notes or renewal notes before the stated maturity of the notes or renewals.

(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), the holders of the notes and renewals of notes may not be provided with the right to require the state to repurchase or redeem the notes and renewals of the notes before their stated maturity unless the state has entered into one or more letter of credit agreements or other liquidity facility agreements:

(a)  for the express purpose of those repurchases or redemptions;

(b)  that require a financially responsible party or parties to the agreement or agreements, other than the state, to purchase or redeem all or any portion of the notes and renewals of notes tendered by the holders of the notes or renewals of notes for repurchase or redemption before the stated maturity of the notes and renewals of notes; and

(c)  that continue until the right of the holders of the notes and renewals of notes to require repurchase or redemption of the notes and renewals of notes before the stated maturity has ceased.

